Wisconsin, session 2025, SB120.
do enact as follows:SB120,11Section 1. 118.1255 of the statutes is created to read:SB120,2,42118.1255 Pupil name change and pronoun usage; policies. (1) In this 3section, “official school records” has the meaning given for “pupil records” in s. 4118.125 (1) (d).SB120,2,65(2) By July 1, 2026, each school board shall adopt a policy related to the 6conditions under which the school board will do each of the following:SB120,2,87(a) Change a pupil’s legal name or a pupil’s legal name and pronouns in 8official school records.SB120,2,119(b) Allow school board employees to regularly use or refer to a pupil who is a 10minor by a name other than the pupil’s legal name or by pronouns other than the 11pronouns provided at the time the pupil first enrolls in the school district.SB120,2,1312(3) A school board shall include at least all of the following in a policy adopted 13under sub. (2) (a):SB120,3,21(a) An initial request to change a pupil’s legal name or pronouns on official 2school records shall be made to the principal of the school the pupil attends.SB120,3,53(b) A pupil’s official school records shall be maintained under a pupil’s legal 4name and the pronouns provided at the time the pupil first enrolls in the school 5district, unless any of the following apply:SB120,3,861. A pupil’s parent or guardian submits a request to change the pupil’s name 7in official school records due to a change in the pupil’s legal name in writing and 8provides documentation of the pupil’s legal name change.SB120,3,1292. If a pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian does not provide documentation 10of the pupil’s legal name change and the pupil is 18 years of age or older, the pupil 11provides an affidavit that includes the pupil’s former legal name and the pupil’s 12new legal name and affirms all of the following:SB120,3,1313a. The pupil has changed the pupil’s legal name.SB120,3,1414b. The pupil consistently uses the new legal name for all official purposes.SB120,3,1515c. The pupil is not a registered sex offender.SB120,3,1716d. The pupil has not changed the pupil’s legal name for a fraudulent purpose 17or in order to interfere with the rights of others.SB120,3,21183. If a pupil or the pupil’s parent or guardian does not provide documentation 19of the pupil’s legal name change and the pupil is younger than 18 years of age, each 20parent or legal guardian of the pupil provides an affidavit that includes the pupil’s 21former legal name and the pupil’s new legal name and affirms all of the following:SB120,3,2222a. The pupil has changed the pupil’s legal name.SB120,3,2323b. The pupil consistently uses the new legal name for all official purposes.SB120,4,21c. Neither the pupil, nor the parent, nor the guardian is prohibited by law 2from changing the pupil’s name.SB120,4,43d. The pupil has not changed the pupil’s legal name for a fraudulent purpose 4or in order to interfere with the rights of others.SB120,4,115(c) For a pupil who is under 18 years of age, before approving a request to 6change the pupil’s legal name or the pupil’s legal name and pronouns in official 7school records, the school board shall make a reasonable attempt to notify each of 8the pupil’s parents and legal guardians who have a right to access the pupil’s 9official school records under s. 118.125 (2) and provide an opportunity for each 10parent or legal guardian to present any additional records or documentation to the 11school board before the school board approves or denies the request.SB120,4,1612(d) If a request for a pupil name change does not include documentation of a 13legal name change and the pupil’s parents or guardians do not all support the 14request to change the pupil’s legal name or the pupil’s legal name and pronouns in 15the pupil’s official school records, a principal or school administrator shall deny the 16request.SB120,4,1917(e) A principal or school administrator may not change a pupil’s legal name or 18pronouns in official school records unless the policy adopted under sub. (2) (a) and 19any procedures developed to implement the policy have been followed.SB120,5,220(f) A procedure under which a parent, legal guardian, or pupil may appeal the 21denial of a request to change the pupil’s legal name or the pupil’s legal name and 22pronouns in official school records to the school board. A school board shall treat an 23appeal under this paragraph in the same manner as a request to correct or delete 1information in official school records that is inaccurate, misleading, or otherwise in 2violation of the privacy rights of students under 20 USC 1232g.SB120,5,43(4) A school board shall include at least all of the following in a policy adopted 4under sub. (2) (b):SB120,5,65(a) A pupil’s parent or legal guardian determines the names and pronouns 6school staff may use to refer to the pupil who is a minor during school hours.SB120,5,97(b) During school hours, school staff may not refer to a pupil who is a minor by 8using a name or pronouns that do not align with the pupil’s biological sex without 9written authorization from the pupil’s parent or legal guardian.SB120,5,1210(c) Written authorization from a parent or legal guardian is not required 11under par. (b) to refer to a pupil using a shortened version of the pupil’s legal first or 12middle name.SB120,5,1413(5) This section may not be construed to impair the rights of pupils, parents, 14or guardians under 20 USC 1232g.SB120,5,1515